Utah statutes.
70A-3-505.   Evidence of dishonor.
(1)  The following are admissible as evidence and create a presumption of
dishonor and of any notice of dishonor stated:
(a)  a document regular in form as provided in Subsection (2) which purports
to be a protest;
(b)  a purported stamp or writing of the drawee, payor bank, or presenting
bank on or accompanying the instrument stating that acceptance or payment has
been refused, unless reasons for the refusal are stated and the reasons are
not consistent with dishonor; or
(c)  a book or record of the drawee, payor bank, or collecting bank, kept in
the usual course of business which shows dishonor, even if there is no
evidence of who made the entry.
(2)  A protest is a certificate of dishonor made by a United States consul or
vice consul, a notary public, or other person authorized to administer oaths
by the law of the place where dishonor occurs.  It may be made upon
information satisfactory to that person.  The protest must identify the
instrument and certify either that presentment has been made or, if not made,
the reason why it was not made, and that the instrument has been dishonored by
nonacceptance or nonpayment.  The protest may also certify that notice of
dishonor has been given to some or all parties.
